Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 11. Firearms.

Sec. 18.65.800.
Possession of firearms in motor vehicles.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state, a municipality, or a person may not adopt or enforce a law, ordinance, policy, or rule that prohibits or has the effect of prohibiting an individual from possessing a firearm while that individual is within a motor vehicle or prohibiting an individual from storing a firearm that is locked in the individual’s motor vehicle while the motor vehicle is otherwise legally parked in or on state or municipal property or another person’s property. This section applies only to possession of a firearm by an individual who may legally possess a firearm under state and federal law.

This section does not limit a person’s rights or remedies under any other law.

The state, a municipality, or a person is not liable for any injury or damage resulting from the storage of a firearm in the vehicle of another individual in accordance with this section.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, an employer or its agent may prohibit the possession of firearms within a secured restricted access area, as defined in AS

29.35.145(e)(2)

, in a vehicle owned, leased, or rented by the employer or its agent or in a parking lot owned or controlled by the employer within 300 feet of the secured restricted access area that does not include common areas of ingress and egress open to the general public. The employer or its agent shall post conspicuous notice of the prohibition against possession of firearms at each entrance to the restricted access area and affected parking area.

History.

(§ 1 ch 82 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In (d) of this section, “AS

29.35.145(e)(2)

” was substituted for “AS

29.35.145(d)

” to reflect the 2005 reorganization of that section.

Sec. 18.65.810.
Execution of federal firearms forms.

The chief administrative officer of a municipal police department for a person who resides in the municipality and the head of the Alaska state troopers for a person who resides in the state but does not reside in a municipality with a police department shall execute within 30 days federal firearms forms required to be submitted by the person as a transferee of a firearm if the person is qualified under state law to possess the firearm.

In this section, “chief administrative officer” has the meaning given in AS

18.65.290

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 24 SLA 2010)